test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-subst-2tav-a_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
  Noun - lavkkâ:
    lavkkâ+N+Sg+Nom:   lavˊkkâ
    lavkkâ+N+Sg+Gen:   laavhâ
    lavkkâ+N+Sg+Ill:   laavhâ
    lavkkâ+N+Sg+Loc:   laavkân
    lavkkâ+N+Sg+Com:   laavhâst
    lavkkâ+N+Sg+Abe:   lavˊháin
    lavkkâ+N+Ess:      laˊvhâttáá
    lavkkâ+N+Pl+Nom:   lavˊkkân
    lavkkâ+N+Pl+Gen:   lavkkâd
    lavkkâ+N+Pl+Acc:   laavhah
    lavkkâ+N+Pl+Ill:   laavhâi laˊvhâi
    lavkkâ+N+Pl+Loc:   laavhâid
    lavkkâ+N+Pl+Com:   lavˊháid
    lavkkâ+N+Pl+Abe:   laavhâin

  Noun - korkkâ:
    korkkâ+N+Sg+Nom:   korˊkkâ
    korkkâ+N+Sg+Gen:   koorhâ
    korkkâ+N+Sg+Ill:   koorhâ
    korkkâ+N+Sg+Loc:   koorkân
    korkkâ+N+Sg+Com:   koorhâst
    korkkâ+N+Sg+Abe:   korˊháin
    korkkâ+N+Ess:      koˊrhâttáá
    korkkâ+N+Pl+Nom:   korkkân
    korkkâ+N+Pl+Gen:   korkkâd
    korkkâ+N+Pl+Acc:   koorhah
    korkkâ+N+Pl+Ill:   koorhâi koˊrhâi
    korkkâ+N+Pl+Loc:   koorhâid
    korkkâ+N+Pl+Com:   korˊháid
    korkkâ+N+Pl+Abe:   koorhâin

  Noun - tulkkâ:
    tulkkâ+N+Sg+Nom:   tulˊkkâ
    tulkkâ+N+Sg+Gen:   tuulhâ
    tulkkâ+N+Sg+Ill:   tuulhâ
    tulkkâ+N+Sg+Loc:   tuulkân
    tulkkâ+N+Sg+Com:   tuulhâst
    tulkkâ+N+Sg+Abe:   tulˊháin
    tulkkâ+N+Ess:      tuˊlhâttáá
    tulkkâ+N+Pl+Nom:   tulˊkkân
    tulkkâ+N+Pl+Gen:   tulkkâd
    tulkkâ+N+Pl+Acc:   tuulhah
    tulkkâ+N+Pl+Ill:   tuulhâi tuˊlhâi
    tulkkâ+N+Pl+Loc:   tuulhâid
    tulkkâ+N+Pl+Com:   tulˊháid
    tulkkâ+N+Pl+Abe:   tuulhâin

  Noun - njamma:
    njamma+N+Sg+Nom:   njamma
    njamma+N+Sg+Gen:   njaˊma
    njamma+N+Sg+Ill:   njaṃa
    njamma+N+Sg+Loc:   njaaṃan
    njamma+N+Sg+Com:   njammaast
    njamma+N+Sg+Abe:   njammain
    njamma+N+Ess:      njaˊmattáá
    njamma+N+Pl+Nom:   njamman
    njamma+N+Pl+Gen:   njammad
    njamma+N+Pl+Acc:   njaˊmah
    njamma+N+Pl+Ill:   njaˊmai
    njamma+N+Pl+Loc:   njammaid
    njamma+N+Pl+Com:   njammaid
    njamma+N+Pl+Abe:   njammain

  Noun - fáddá:
    fáddá+N+Sg+Nom:   fáddá
    fáddá+N+Sg+Gen:   fáádá
    fáddá+N+Sg+Ill:   fáádá
    fáddá+N+Sg+Loc:   fáádán
    fáddá+N+Sg+Com:   fáádást
    fáddá+N+Sg+Abe:   fáddáin
    fáddá+N+Ess:      fáˊdáttáá
    fáddá+N+Pl+Nom:   fáddán
    fáddá+N+Pl+Gen:   fáddád
    fáddá+N+Pl+Acc:   fáádáh
    fáddá+N+Pl+Ill:   fáádái fáˊdái
    fáddá+N+Pl+Loc:   fáádáid
    fáddá+N+Pl+Com:   fáddáid
    fáddá+N+Pl+Abe:   fáádáin

  Noun - alme:
    alme+N+Sg+Nom:   alˊme
    alme+N+Sg+Gen:   aˊlme
    alme+N+Sg+Ill:   aˊlme
    alme+N+Sg+Loc:   aalman
    alme+N+Sg+Com:   alˊmeest
    alme+N+Sg+Abe:   olˊmijn
    alme+N+Ess:      aˊlmettáá
    alme+N+Pl+Nom:   alˊmen
    alme+N+Pl+Gen:   almed
    alme+N+Pl+Acc:   aˊlmeh
    alme+N+Pl+Ill:   oolmij oˊlmij
    alme+N+Pl+Loc:   oolmijd
    alme+N+Pl+Com:   olˊmijd
    alme+N+Pl+Abe:   oolmijn

  Noun - sgnom:
    sgnom+N+Sg+Nom:   sgnom
    sgnom+N+Sg+Gen:   sggen
    sgnom+N+Sg+Ill:   sgaˊcc
    sgnom+N+Sg+Loc:   sgiˊll
    sgnom+N+Sg+Com:   sgloc
    sgnom+N+Sg+Abe:   sgcom
    sgnom+N+Ess:      sgaˊbe
    sgnom+N+Pl+Nom:   eˊss
    sgnom+N+Pl+Gen:   par
    sgnom+N+Pl+Acc:   plnom
    sgnom+N+Pl+Ill:   plgen
    sgnom+N+Pl+Loc:   plaˊcc
    sgnom+N+Pl+Com:   pliˊll
    sgnom+N+Pl+Abe:   plloc
